Maryland, session 2026, SB0551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0551*

SENATE BILL 551
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES THAT ARE
ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE AN INDIVIDUAL
WITH SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE FOR OVARIAN CANCER PREVENTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY NOT IMPOSE A COPAYMENT,
COINSURANCE, OR DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT ON SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE
FOR OVARIAN CANCER PREVENTION.
(2) IF AN INSURED OR ENROLLEE IS COVERED UNDER A
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH PLAN, AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. § 223, AN ENTITY
SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION MAY SUBJECT SALPINGECTOMY COVERAGE FOR
OVARIAN CANCER PREVENTION TO THE DEDUCTIBLE REQUIREMENT OF THE
HIGH–DEDUCTIBLE PLAN.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.